Texas statutes.
BUSINESS ORGANIZATIONS CODE

TITLE 7. PROFESSIONAL ENTITIES

CHAPTER 304. PROVISIONS RELATING TO PROFESSIONAL LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES

Sec. 304.001. APPLICABILITY OF CERTAIN PROVISIONS GOVERNING LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES. Title 3 applies to a professional limited liability company, unless there is a conflict with this title.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2006.